North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 45. Pawnbrokers, Metal Dealers, and Scrap Dealers.
§ 66-409.
Bond or trust account required.

Before any permit shall be issued to a dealer pursuant to

G.S. 66-407

, the dealer shall execute a satisfactory cash or surety bond or establish a trust account with a licensed and insured bank or savings institution located in the State of North Carolina in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The bond or trust account shall be in favor of the State of North Carolina. A surety bond is to be executed by the dealer and by two responsible sureties or a surety company licensed to do business in the State of North Carolina and shall be on a form approved by the Department of Public Safety. Any bond shall be kept in full force and effect and shall be delivered to the law-enforcement agency which first issued a current permit to the dealer. A bond or trust account shall be for the faithful performance of the requirements and obligations of the dealer’s business in conformity with this Part. Any law-enforcement agency shall have full power and authority to revoke the permit and sue for forfeiture of the bond or trust account upon a breach thereof. Any person who shall have suffered any loss or damage by any act of the permittee that constitutes a violation of this Part shall have the right to institute an action to recover against such permittee and the surety or trust account. Upon termination of the bond or trust account the permit shall become void.

History.

1981, c. 956, s. 1; c. 1001, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-46, ss. 15, 20.

§ 66-410.
Records to be kept.

Every dealer to whom a permit has been issued pursuant to

G.S. 66-407

shall maintain consecutively numbered records of each precious metals transaction. Each consecutively numbered record shall be made at the time of the transaction and shall contain a clear and accurate description of the transaction. A valid description shall include each of the following applicable and available items of information: the manufacturer’s name, the model, the model number, the serial number, and any engraved numbers or initials found on the items; the date of the transaction; the name, sex, race, residence, telephone number and driver’s license number of the person selling the items purchased; and the signature of both the dealer or registered employee and the seller. In the event the seller cannot furnish valid, unexpired photographic identification in the form of a drivers license, State-issued identification card, passport, or military identification card, the dealer shall require two forms of positive identification.

The consecutively numbered records required by this section shall be kept either (i) in a paginated, bound book or set of books with pages numbered in sequence or (ii) in an electronic database that prevents record deletion, tracks all modifications to records, and provides for electronic signatures.

The records shall be open at all reasonable times to inspection on the premises by law enforcement agencies, and an individual record shall be retained for at least two years after a transaction. If a dealer maintains a record book rather than an electronic database, the book shall be retained until at least two years following the last recorded transaction.

A copy of each consecutively numbered record entry shall be filed within 48 hours of the transaction in the office of the local law enforcement agency. Records shall be filed in the manner authorized by the local law enforcement agency, which may include reporting electronically by transmission over a computer network, by facsimile machine, or by hand delivering hard copies to the local law enforcement agency. In any case where a technological failure prevents a dealer from reporting electronically or by facsimile, the dealer shall have the option of hand delivering a hard copy of the record to the local law enforcement agency. Regardless of the manner in which the local law enforcement agency allows reporting, a dealer shall provide a hard copy of records upon the request of a law enforcement agency.

The files of local law enforcement agencies that contain copies of records shall not be subject to inspection and examination as authorized by

G.S. 132-6

. Any public official or employee who shall knowingly and willfully permit any person to have access to or custody or possession of any portion of such files, unless the person is one specifically authorized by the local law enforcement agency to have access for purposes of law enforcement investigation or civil or criminal proceedings, shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall only be fined up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) in the discretion of the court.

History.

1981, c. 956, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 526; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2009-482, s. 4; 2012-46, ss. 15, 21.

§ 66-411.
Items not to be modified.

No item included in a dealer purchase shall be sold, traded or otherwise disposed of, melted, cut or otherwise changed in form nor shall any item be removed from the licensed premises, or other location specified on the application for a special occasion permit, for a period of seven days from the date the transaction was reported in accordance with

G.S. 66-410

.

History.

1981, c. 956, s. 1; 2009-482, s. 5; 2012-46, ss. 15, 22.

§ 66-412.
Purchasing from juvenile.

No dealer or employee or agent thereof shall purchase from any juvenile under 18 years of age any article made, in whole or in part, of precious metal.

History.

1981, c. 956, s. 1; 2012-46, s. 15.

§ 66-413.
Penalties.

Any dealer who violates the provisions of this Part shall be deemed guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. In addition any dealer so convicted shall be ineligible for a dealer’s permit for a period of three years from the date of conviction. Each and every violation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

History.

1981, c. 956, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 527; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2012-46, ss. 15, 23.

§ 66-414.
Portable smelters prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess or operate a smelter in any mobile home, trailer, camper, or other vehicle or structure not permanently affixed to the ground, for the purpose of refining precious metals. Violation of the provisions of this section shall constitute a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1981, c. 956, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 528; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2012-46, s. 15.

§§ 66-415 through 66-419.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Regulation of Sales and Purchases of Metals.

§ 66-420.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

Cash card system. — A system of payment that provides payment in cash or in a form other than cash and that when providing payment in the form of cash (i) captures a photograph of the seller at the time payment is received and (ii) uses an automated cash dispenser, including, but not limited to, an automated teller machine.

(1a)

Copper. — Nonferrous metals, including, but not limited to, copper wire, copper clad steel wire, copper pipe, copper bars, copper sheeting, copper tubing and pipe fittings, and insulated copper wire. The term shall not include brass alloys, bronze alloys, lead, nickel, zinc, or items not containing a significant quantity of copper.

Fixed site. — A site occupied by a secondary metals recycler as the owner of the site or as a lessee of the site under a lease or other rental agreement providing for occupation of the site by a nonferrous metals purchaser for a total duration of not less than 364 days.

Law enforcement officer. — Any duly constituted law enforcement officer of the State or of any municipality or county.

Nonferrous metals. — Metals not containing significant quantities of iron or steel, including, but not limited to, copper, aluminum other than aluminum cans, a product that is a mixture of aluminum and copper, catalytic converters, lead-acid batteries, and stainless steel beer kegs or containers. The term shall not include precious metals as defined and regulated in Part 2 of this Article.

Nonferrous metals purchaser. — A secondary metals recycler who purchases, gathers, or obtains nonferrous metals.

Permit. — A permit issued pursuant to G.S. 66-426(a).

Regulated metals property. — All ferrous and nonferrous metals.

Secondary metals recycler. — Any person, firm, or corporation in the State:

That is engaged in the business of gathering or obtaining ferrous or nonferrous metals that have served their original economic purpose or is in the business of performing the manufacturing process by which ferrous metals or nonferrous metals are converted into raw material products consisting of prepared grades and having an existing or potential economic value; or

That has facilities for performing the manufacturing process by which ferrous metals or nonferrous metals are converted into raw material products consisting of prepared grades and having an existing or potential economic value, by methods including, but not limited to, the processing, sorting, cutting, classifying, cleaning, baling, wrapping, shredding, shearing, or changing the physical form or chemical content of the metals, but not including the exclusive use of hand tools.

History.

2012-46, s. 28; 2013-169, s. 1.

§ 66-420.1.
Applicability.

This Chapter shall not apply to a salvage yard regulated pursuant to Chapter 20 of the General Statutes, unless the salvage yard is engaged in the business of gathering or obtaining ferrous or nonferrous metals that have served their original economic purpose and is in the business of performing the manufacturing process by which ferrous metals or nonferrous metals are converted into raw material products consisting of prepared grades and having an existing or potential economic value.

History.

2013-410, s. 30.5.

§ 66-421.
Required records and receipts for regulated metals transactions.

Receipt Required. — A secondary metals recycler shall issue a receipt for all purchase transactions in which the secondary metals recycler purchases regulated metals property. This receipt shall be issued to and signed by the person delivering the property, and the secondary metals recycler shall be able to provide documentation regarding the employee who completed the transaction.

Records Required. — A secondary metals recycler shall maintain an electronic record of all purchase transactions in which the secondary metals recycler purchases regulated metals property. The record of each transaction shall contain the following information:

The name and address of the secondary metals recycler.

The name, initials, or other identification of the individual entering the information.

The date of the transaction.

The weight of the regulated metals property purchased.

The description made in accordance with the custom of the trade of the type of regulated metals property purchased and the physical address where the regulated metals were obtained by the seller and the date when purchased, and a statement signed by the seller or the seller’s agent certifying that the seller or the seller’s agent has the lawful right to sell and dispose of the property.

The amount of consideration given for the regulated metals property.

The name and address of the vendor of the regulated metals property and the license plate number, make, model, and color of the vehicle used to deliver the regulated metals.

A photocopy or electronic scan of the unexpired drivers license or state or federally issued photo identification card of the person delivering the regulated metals property to the secondary metals recycler. If the secondary metals recycler has a copy of the valid photo identification of the person delivering the regulated metals property on file, the secondary metals recycler must examine the photo identification and verify that it has not expired, but may reference the photo identification that is on file without making a separate photocopy or electronic scan for each subsequent transaction. If the person delivering the regulated metals property does not have an unexpired drivers license or an unexpired state or federally issued photo identification card, the secondary metals recycler shall not complete the transaction.

A copy of the receipt required under subsection (a) of this section when all the information required under subsection (a) of this section is clear and legible or, in the event the copy of the receipt is not clear or not legible, the original receipt.

A video or digital photograph of the seller together with the regulated metals property being delivered by the seller. The video or photograph required by this section shall be of a quality that is sufficient to allow a person of ordinary faculties to identify the person recorded or photographed.

In transactions involving catalytic converters that are not attached to a vehicle, and central air conditioner evaporator coils or condensers, the person delivering the materials shall place next to that person’s signature on the receipt required under subsection (a) of this section, a clear impression of that person’s index finger that is in ink and free of any smearing. A secondary metals recycler may elect to obtain the fingerprint electronically. If the secondary metals recycler has a copy of the fingerprint of the person delivering the nonferrous metal on file, the secondary metals recycler must examine the photo identification, but may reference the fingerprint that is on file without making a separate fingerprint for each subsequent transaction. If a secondary metals recycler purchases a catalytic converter pursuant to G.S. 66-424(a)(3a), then the secondary metals recycler shall make and retain a copy of all documentation provided to and relied upon by the secondary metals recycler in determining the status of the seller of the catalytic converter.

History.

2012-46, s. 28; 2021-154, s. 2.

§ 66-422.
Inspection of regulated metals property and records.

Retention of Records. — A secondary metals recycler shall keep and maintain the information required under

G.S. 66-421(b)

for not less than two years from the date of the purchase of the regulated metals property. Records shall be securely maintained at all times and shall be destroyed in a manner that protects the identity of the owner of the property, the seller of the property, and the purchaser of the property.

Inspection of Regulated Metals Property and Records. — During the usual and customary business hours of a secondary metals recycler, a law enforcement officer shall have the right to inspect all of the following:

Any and all purchased regulated metals property in the possession of the secondary metals recycler.

Any and all records required to be maintained under

G.S. 66-421(b)

.

Making Receipts Available for Inspection by Law Enforcement. — A secondary metals recycler shall make receipts for the purchase of regulated metals property available for pickup each regular workday if requested by the sheriff or chief of police of the county or the chief of police of the municipality in which the secondary metals recycler is located. The sheriff or the chief of police may request these receipts to be electronically transferred directly to the law enforcement agency. Records retained by a law enforcement agency shall be securely retained as required by law and destroyed in a manner that protects the identity of the owner of the property, the seller of the property, and the purchaser of the property.

Records Are Not Public. — Records submitted to any public law enforcement agency pursuant to this section are records of criminal investigations or records of criminal intelligence information as defined in

G.S. 132-1.4

and are not public records as defined by

G.S. 132-1

.

History.

2012-46, s. 28.

§ 66-423.
Hold notices for nonferrous metals; retention of nonferrous metals.

Hold Notices. — When a law enforcement officer has reasonable suspicion to believe that any item of nonferrous metal in the possession of a nonferrous metals purchaser has been stolen, the law enforcement officer may issue a hold notice to the nonferrous metals purchaser. The hold notice must be in writing, be delivered to the nonferrous metals purchaser, specifically identify those items of nonferrous metal that are believed to have been stolen and that are subject to the notice, and inform the nonferrous metals purchaser of the information contained in this section. Upon receipt of the notice, the nonferrous metals purchaser must not process or remove the items of nonferrous metal identified in the notice, or any portion thereof, from the secondary metal recycler’s fixed site for 15 calendar days after receipt of the notice unless released prior to the 15-day period by the law enforcement officer. A hold notice may be renewed for an additional 30 days by the law enforcement officer. A renewal must satisfy the same requirements as an initial hold notice in order to be valid.

Retention of Nonferrous Metals. — Any secondary metals recycler owner convicted of a felonious violation of this Article,

G.S. 14-71

, 14-71.1, or 14-72 shall hold and retain nonferrous metals for seven days from the date of purchase before selling, dismantling, crushing, defacing, or in any manner altering or disposing of the regulated metals property.

History.

2012-46, s. 28.

§ 66-424.
Prohibited activities and transactions.

A secondary metals recycler shall not do any of the following:

Operate any business that cashes checks at a fixed site at which the secondary metals recycler purchases regulated metals property.

Purchase nonferrous metals for the purpose of recycling the nonferrous metals, unless the nonferrous metals purchaser possesses a valid permit.

Purchase any central air conditioner evaporator coils or condensers, except that a secondary metals recycler may purchase these items from a company, contractor, or individual that is in the business of installing, replacing, maintaining, or removing these items.

(3a)

Purchase any catalytic converters that are not attached to a vehicle, except that a secondary metals recycler may purchase these items from a person listed in G.S. 14-72.8(b).

Purchase any regulated metals property that the secondary metals recycler knows or reasonably should know to be stolen.

It shall be unlawful to transport or possess on highways of this State an amount of copper weighing in the aggregate more than 25 pounds, unless at least one of the following is true:

The vehicle is used in the ordinary course of business for the purpose of transporting nonferrous metals. This term includes vehicles used by gas, electric, communications, water, plumbing, electrical, and climate conditioning service providers, and their employees, agents, and contractors, in the course of providing these services.

The person transporting or possessing the copper possesses, and presents when requested, a valid bill of sale for the copper.

A law enforcement officer determines that the copper is not stolen and is in the rightful possession of the person.

A secondary metals recycler shall not purchase any of the following:

Any regulated metal marked with the initials or other identification of a telephone, cable, electric, water, or other public utility, or any brewer.

Any utility access cover.

Any street light pole or fixture.

Any road or bridge guard rail.

Any highway or street sign.

Any water meter cover.

Any metal beer keg, including any made of stainless steel that is clearly marked as being the property of the beer manufacturer.

Any traffic directional or control sign.

Any traffic light signal.

Any regulated metal marked with the name of a government entity.

Any spikes, plates, or other railroad track components or signs, and any property owned by a railroad and marked and otherwise identified as such.

Any historical marker or any grave marker or burial vase.

It shall be unlawful for any person that is not a secondary metals recycler to purchase a used catalytic converter not attached to a vehicle.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a used and detached catalytic converter that has been tested, certified, and labeled, or otherwise approved for reuse, and being bought or sold for purposes of reuse, in accordance with the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.) and regulations under the Clean Air Act, as they may, from time to time, be amended.

History.

2012-46, s. 28; 2021-154, s. 4.

§ 66-425.
Permissible payment methods for nonferrous metals purchasers.

Limitation on Cash Purchases.—

No nonferrous metals purchaser shall enter into a cash transaction for the purchase of copper, and no nonferrous metals purchaser shall purchase any nonferrous metal property for any cash consideration greater than one hundred dollars ($100.00) per transaction. Any payment in excess of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per transaction shall be made by check, money order or cash card system. A nonferrous metals purchaser shall not make more than one cash purchase per day from any individual, business, corporation or partnership.

History.

2012-46, s. 28.

§ 66-426.
Issuance of nonferrous metals purchase permits by Sheriff; form; fees; recordkeeping.

Issuance of Permits. — The sheriff of each county shall issue a nonferrous metals purchase permit to an applicant if the applicant (i) has a fixed site in the sheriff’s county; (ii) declares on a form provided by the sheriff that the applicant is informed of and will comply with the provisions of this Part; (iii) does not have a permit that has been revoked pursuant to

G.S. 66-429(b)

at the time of the application; and (iv) has not been convicted of more than three violations of this Part. A permit shall be valid for 12 months and shall be valid only for fixed sites in the county of issuance. A permit shall be obtained for each fixed site at which nonferrous metals are purchased.

Form. — The Attorney General shall prescribe a standard application form and a standard permit form to be used by sheriffs. The permit form shall contain, at a minimum, the date of issuance and the name and address of the permit holder.

Fees; Record-Keeping Requirements. — The sheriff shall not charge a fee for a permit, and shall retain a copy of any permit issued.

History.

2012-46, s. 28; 2012-194, s. 46(a).

§ 66-427.
Exemptions.

This Part does not apply to:

Purchases of regulated metals property from a manufacturing, industrial, government, or other commercial vendor that generates or sells regulated metals property in the ordinary course of its business.

Purchases of regulated metals property that involve only beverage containers, except that

G.S. 66-423

shall apply in that case.

History.

2012-46, s. 28.

§ 66-428.
Preemption.

A county or municipality shall not enact any local law, ordinance, or regulation regulating secondary metals recyclers or regulated metals property that conflicts with this Part, and this Part preempts all existing laws, ordinances, or regulations that conflict with it.

History.

2012-46, s. 28.

§ 66-429.
Violations.

Punishment Generally. — Unless the conduct is covered by some other provision of law providing greater punishment, any person knowingly and willfully violating any of the provisions of this Part shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor for a first offense. A second or subsequent violation of this Part is a Class I felony. In addition to any other punishment imposed for a violation of this Part, any person knowingly and willfully violating any of the provisions of this Part involving the purchase of a catalytic converter shall be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

Revocation of Permits. — If the owner or the employees of a fixed site are convicted of an aggregate of three or more violations of this Part within a 10 year period, the permit associated with that fixed site shall be immediately revoked by the sheriff for a period of six months. Any attempt to circumvent this subsection by procuring a permit through a family member shall result in extension of the revocation period for an additional 18 months.

History.

2012-46, s. 28; 2021-154, s. 3.

§ 66-430.
Restitution.

The court may order a defendant to make restitution to the secondary metals recycler or property owner, as appropriate, for any damage or loss caused by the defendant and arising out of a violation of

G.S. 14-71

,

G.S. 14-71.1

,

G.S. 14-72

, G.S.14-159.4, G.S. 66-424(a)(3), G.S. 66-424(a)(3a), or G.S. 66-424(a)(4) committed by the defendant.

History.

2012-46, s. 28; 2021-154, s. 5.

§ 66-431.
Forfeiture of vehicles used to transport unlawfully obtained regulated metals property.

Vehicles which are used or intended for use to convey or transport, or in any manner to facilitate the conveyance or transportation of unlawfully obtained regulated metals property, as defined by this Part, are subject to forfeiture, except that:

No conveyance shall be forfeited under the provisions of this section by reason of any act or omission, committed or omitted while such conveyance was unlawfully in the possession of a person other than the owner in violation of the criminal laws of the United States, or of any state;

No conveyance shall be forfeited unless the violation involved is a felony;

A forfeiture of a vehicle encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party who had no knowledge of or consented to the act or omission;

No conveyance shall be forfeited under the provisions of this section unless the owner knew or had reason to believe the vehicle was being used in the commission of any violation that may subject the conveyance to forfeiture under this section.

Any vehicle subject to forfeiture under this section may be seized by any law enforcement officer upon process issued by any district or superior court having jurisdiction over the vehicle except that seizure without such process may be made when:

The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant;

The vehicle subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the State in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding under this section.

Vehicles taken or detained under this section shall not be repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in custody of the law enforcement agency seizing it, which may:

Place the vehicle under seal; or

Remove the vehicle to a place designated by it; or

Request that the North Carolina Department of Justice take custody of the vehicle and remove it to an appropriate location for disposition in accordance with law.

Any vehicle seized by a State, local, or county law enforcement officer shall be held in safekeeping as provided in this subsection until an order of disposition is properly entered by the judge.

Whenever a vehicle is forfeited under this section, the law enforcement agency having custody of it may:

Retain the vehicle for official use; or

Sell any forfeited vehicle, provided that the proceeds be disposed of for payment of all proper expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expense of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, and court costs; or

Transfer any vehicles which are forfeited under the provisions of this section to the North Carolina Department of Justice when, in the discretion of the presiding judge and upon application of the North Carolina Department of Justice, said vehicle may be of official use to the North Carolina Department of Justice;

Upon determination by the director of any law enforcement agency that a vehicle transferred pursuant to the provisions of this section is of no further use to said agency for use in official investigations, such vehicle may be sold as surplus property in the same manner as other vehicles owned by the law enforcement agency, and the proceeds from such sale after deducting the cost of sale shall be paid to the treasurer or proper officer authorized to receive fines and forfeitures to be used for the school fund of the county in the county in which said vehicle was seized; provided, that any vehicle transferred to any law enforcement agency under the provisions of this section which has been modified to increase speed shall be used in the performance of official duties only and not for resale, transfer, or disposition other than as junk.

History.

2007-301, s. 3; 2012-46, ss. 27, 29.

§§ 66-432 through 66-439.

Reserved for future codification purposes.